Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.420

Order of appointment of conservator.

(1) A court order appointing a conservator for a minor must include findings to support appointment of a conservator and, if a full conservatorship is granted, the reason a limited conservatorship would not meet the identified needs of the minor.

(2) A court order appointing a conservator for a minor may dispense with the requirement for the conservator to file reports with the court under RCW 11.130.530 if all the property of the minor subject to the conservatorship is protected by a verified receipt.

(3) A court order appointing a conservator for an adult must:

(a) Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence has established that the identified needs of the respondent cannot be met by a protective arrangement instead of conservatorship or other less restrictive alternatives, including use of appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making; and

(b) Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established the respondent was given proper notice of the hearing on the petition.

(4) A court order establishing a full conservatorship for an adult must state the basis for granting a full conservatorship and include specific findings to support the conclusion that a limited conservatorship would not meet the functional needs of the adult.

(5) A court order establishing a limited conservatorship must state the specific property placed under the control of the conservator and the powers granted to the conservator.

(6) The court, as part of an order establishing a conservatorship, shall identify any person that subsequently is entitled to:

(a) Notice of the rights of the individual subject to conservatorship under *RCW 11.130.425(2);

(b) Notice of a sale of or surrender of a lease to the primary dwelling of the individual;

(c) Notice that the conservator has delegated a power that requires court approval under RCW 11.130.435 or substantially all powers of the conservator;

(d) Notice that the conservator will be unavailable to perform the conservator's duties for more than one month;

(e) A copy of the conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510 and the conservator's report under RCW 11.130.530;

(f) Access to court records relating to the conservatorship;

(g) Notice of a transaction involving a substantial conflict between the conservator's fiduciary duties and personal interests;

(h) Notice of the death or significant change in the condition of the individual;

(i) Notice that the court has limited or modified the powers of the conservator; and

(j) Notice of the removal of the conservator.

(7) If an individual subject to conservatorship is an adult, the spouse, domestic partner, and adult children of the adult subject to conservatorship are entitled under subsection (6) of this section to notice unless the court orders otherwise based on good cause. Good cause includes the court's determination that notice would be contrary to the preferences or prior directions of the adult subject to conservatorship.

(8) If an individual subject to conservatorship is a minor, each parent and adult sibling of the minor is entitled under subsection (6) of this section to notice unless the court determines notice would not be in the best interest of the minor.

(9) All orders establishing a conservatorship for an adult must contain:

(a) A conservatorship summary placed directly below the case caption or on a separate cover page in the form or substantially the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.665;

(b) The date which the limited conservator or conservator must file the conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510;

(c) The date which the limited conservator or conservator must file an inventory under RCW 11.130.515;

(d) The date by which the court will review the conservator's plan as required by RCW 11.130.510;

(e) The report interval which the conservator must file its report under RCW 11.130.530. The report interval may be annual, biennial, or triennial;

(f) The date the limited conservator or conservator must file its report under RCW 11.130.530. The due date of the filing of the report shall be within ninety days after the anniversary date of the appointment;

(g) The date for the court to review the report under RCW 11.130.530 and enter its order. The court shall conduct the review within one hundred twenty days after the anniversary date of the appointment.

[ 2020 c 312 s 215; 2019 c 437 s 411.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 11.130.425 was amended by 2024 c 267 s 10, changing subsection (2) to subsection (1).

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.